Utah statutes.
70A-7a-206.   Termination of storage at warehouse's option.
(1)  A warehouse, by giving notice to the person on whose account the goods
are held and any other person known to claim an interest in the goods, may
require payment of any charges and removal of the goods from the warehouse at
the termination of the period of storage fixed by the document of title or, if
a period is not fixed, within a stated period not less than 30 days after the
warehouse gives notice.  If the goods are not removed before the date
specified in the notice, the warehouse may sell them pursuant to Section 70A-
7a-210.
(2)  If a warehouse in good faith believes that goods are about to deteriorate
or decline in value to less than the amount of its lien within the time
provided in Subsection (1) and Section 70A-7a-210, the warehouse may specify
in the notice given under Subsection (1) any reasonable shorter time for
removal of the goods and, if the goods are not removed, may sell them at
public sale held not less than one week after a single advertisement or
posting.
(3)  If, as a result of a quality or condition of the goods of which the
warehouse did not have notice at the time of deposit, the goods are a hazard
to other property, the warehouse facilities, or other persons, the warehouse
may sell the goods at public or private sale without advertisement or posting
on reasonable notification to all persons known to claim an interest in the
goods.  If the warehouse, after a reasonable effort, is unable to sell the
goods, it may dispose of them in any lawful manner and does not incur
liability by reason of that disposition.
(4)  A warehouse shall deliver the goods to any person entitled to them under
this chapter upon due demand made at any time before sale or other disposition
under this section.
(5)  A warehouse may satisfy its lien from the proceeds of any sale or
disposition under this section but shall hold the balance for delivery on the
demand of any person to which the warehouse would have been bound to deliver
the goods.
